Utah statutes.
4-22-4.5.   Exemption from certain operational requirements.

The commission is exempt from:

(1)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(2)  Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(3)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(4)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act; and

(5)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

